Louisiana, session 2026, SB361.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Art. 2315.14 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2315.14. General damages; limitation of liability; exceptions
A. Except as otherwise provided in this Article, general damages shall
not be awarded in a delictual action in an amount in excess of five hundred
thousand dollars, regardless of the number of parties against whom the action
is brought or the number of actions brought.
B. If the trier of fact finds that a claimant has suffered a permanent
mental injury that severely impairs the claimant's ability to be employed or
enjoy a reasonable standard of living, general damages shall not be awarded in
a delictual action in an amount in excess of one million dollars, regardless of the
number of parties against whom the action is brought or the number of actions
brought.
C. The limitations on general damages imposed by Paragraph A and
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-635 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 361
Paragraph B of this Article shall not apply if the trier of fact finds that the
claimant has suffered permanent and severe physical injury, including a
substantial physical abnormality or disfigurement, loss of use of a limb, loss of
or substantial impairment to a major body organ or system, or an injury that
renders the claimant permanently incapable of independent self-care or the
ability to perform life-sustaining activities.
D. The limitations on general damages imposed by Paragraph A and
Paragraph B of this Article shall not apply if the trier of fact finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the tortfeasor's actions were intentional or malicious.